Utah statutes.
30-1-13.   Solemnization without license -- Penalty.

If any person knowingly solemnizes a marriage without a license, and if either party is under 16 years of age, without a written authorization from a juvenile court, he is guilty of a third degree felony.



Amended by Chapter 129, 2001 General Session

